New York, session 2025-2026, S10069.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law is 2 amended by adding a new section 1367-b to read as follows: 3 § 1367-b. Know your customer requirements for mobile sports wagering 4 licensees. 1. The terms used in this section shall have the same mean- 5 ings as set forth in subdivision one of section thirteen hundred sixty- 6 seven and subdivision one of section thirteen hundred sixty-seven-a of 7 this title. For the purposes of this section, section thirteen hundred 8 sixty-seven and section thirteen hundred sixty-seven-a of this title, 9 the following terms shall have the following meanings: 10 (a) "At-risk sports bettor" shall mean an authorized sports bettor 11 who, following completion of a risk assessment conducted pursuant to 12 subdivision seven of this section, has been determined to be at signif- 13 icant risk of gambling-related harm and is designated as such; 14 (b) "Account sharing" shall mean the use of an authorized sports 15 bettor's account by any person other than the authorized sports bettor 16 for whom such account was created; 17 (c) "Elevated-risk sports bettor" shall mean an at-risk sports bettor 18 who, following completion of a risk assessment conducted pursuant to 19 subdivision seven of this section, is determined to be at persistent or 20 escalating risk of significant gambling-related harm; 21 (d) "Gambling-related harm" shall mean significant psychological, 22 self-inflicted physical, occupational, financial, legal, domestic, or 23 familial harm resulting from or reasonably attributable to gambling-re- 24 lated actions or patterns of behavior, including problem gambling and 25 gambling addiction; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14473-06-6 S. 10069 2 1 (e) "High-risk sports bettor" shall mean an at-risk sports bettor who, 2 following completion of a risk assessment conducted pursuant to subdivi- 3 sion seven of this section, is determined to be at chronic or acute risk 4 of severe or imminent gambling-related harm; 5 (f) "Prospective sports bettor" shall mean a person seeking to partic- 6 ipate in mobile sports wagering who has not been verified as an author- 7 ized sports bettor; 8 (g) "Proxy betting" shall mean an authorized sports bettor placing a 9 sports wager on behalf of another person; 10 (h) "Responsible gaming" means policies, procedures, and controls 11 reasonably designed and implemented to promote informed decision making, 12 identify and assess risk of gambling-related harm, and mitigate such 13 harm; 14 (i) "Risk assessment" shall mean a documented, comprehensive examina- 15 tion of the nature, frequency, and severity of risk factors, both indi- 16 vidually and in combination, associated with an authorized sports bettor 17 to determine whether such authorized sports bettor is at significant 18 risk of gambling-related harm pursuant to subdivision seven of this 19 section; and 20 (j) "Risk factor" shall mean behavioral, transactional, or financial 21 patterns that may reasonably indicate risk of gambling-related harm, 22 including those identified pursuant to subdivision six of this section. 23 2. (a) Prior to activating an account or permitting a prospective 24 sports bettor to place a sports wager, a mobile sports wagering licensee 25 shall require such prospective sports bettor to provide, at a minimum, 26 the following: 27 (i) full legal name; 28 (ii) physical residential address, including zip code; 29 (iii) date of birth; 30 (iv) the last four digits of the social security number; provided, 31 however, that: (A) such prospective sports bettor may voluntarily 32 provide the full social security number or a driver license number in 33 lieu of the last four digits; or (B) if such prospective sports bettor 34 does not possess a social security number, such prospective sports 35 bettor may provide an equivalent government-issued identification 36 number, such as a passport number or taxpayer identification number; 37 (v) a valid email address; 38 (vi) a valid telephone number; 39 (vii) a photograph of a driver license or other government-issued 40 identification card; and 41 (viii) a live photograph. 42 (b) All information required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdi- 43 vision shall be directly and affirmatively provided by the prospective 44 sports bettor. A mobile sports wagering licensee shall not pre-populate, 45 auto-fill, suggest, derive, or otherwise present such required informa- 46 tion for confirmation or selection by a prospective sports bettor. 47 (c) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall request, on a voluntary 48 basis and not as a condition of account creation or wagering, the 49 following information, which may be used in aggregate form only for 50 purposes of research, regulatory oversight, and responsible gaming anal- 51 ysis: 52 (i) race and ethnicity; 53 (ii) gender; and 54 (iii) estimated annual income. 55 (d) No account shall be activated and no sports wager shall be permit- 56 ted unless the mobile sports wagering licensee has verified the identity S. 10069 3 1 of the prospective sports bettor pursuant to subdivision three of this 2 section. 3 (e) Prior to placing an initial sports wager, an authorized sports 4 bettor shall affirmatively acknowledge and attest, at a minimum, the 5 following: 6 (i) the information provided in connection with the creation of the 7 account is accurate and complete; 8 (ii) such authorized sports bettor is at least twenty-one years of 9 age; 10 (iii) such authorized sports bettor is not a prohibited sports bettor; 11 (iv) only such authorized sports bettor shall access the account and 12 such authorized sports bettor shall not permit any other person to 13 access or use the account or engage in account sharing or proxy betting; 14 (v) the account is the only mobile sports wagering account such 15 authorized sports bettor owns with the particular skin and that such 16 account is not transferable; 17 (vi) no sports wager on the account shall be made by computerized 18 software or other automated or unauthorized mechanisms; and 19 (vii) such authorized sports bettor accepts the terms and conditions 20 of opening an account and agrees to comply with applicable law. 21 (f) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall permit an authorized 22 sports bettor to permanently close such authorized sports bettor's 23 account at any time and for any reason. 24 (i) Upon closure of an account, any funds remaining in such account, 25 less any amounts lawfully withheld pursuant to this chapter or commis- 26 sion regulation, shall be returned to the authorized sports bettor with- 27 out unreasonable delay and in accordance with commission regulation. 28 (ii) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall not impose unnecessary 29 barriers, conditions, or delays on the closure of an account or the 30 return of funds. 31 3. (a) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall establish and maintain 32 written identity verification procedures reasonably designed to form a 33 reasonable belief that such mobile sports wagering licensee knows the 34 true identity of each prospective sports bettor prior to activating an 35 account or accepting sports wagers from such prospective sports bettor. 36 (b) Such identity verification procedures shall: (i) be incorporated 37 into the mobile sports wagering licensee's system of internal controls; 38 (ii) ensure that no prohibited sports bettor is permitted to activate or 39 access an account or place sports wagers; and (iii) include measures 40 reasonably designed to detect and prevent identity theft, fraud, and 41 duplicate or otherwise unlawful accounts. 42 (c) Such identity verification procedures shall, at a minimum and to 43 the extent reasonably practicable, include the following: 44 (i) verification of the authenticity of identifying information 45 obtained pursuant to subdivision two of this section through one or more 46 independent and reliable data sources, including commercially available 47 fraud-detection databases, public records, or other comparable sources; 48 (ii) identification of material discrepancies in identifying informa- 49 tion and documented resolution of such discrepancies prior to account 50 activation; 51 (iii) provision for verification through documentary methods, non-do- 52 cumentary methods, or a combination thereof, as appropriate; and 53 (iv) application of enhanced verification procedures where identifying 54 information is inconsistent, incomplete, associated with multiple 55 accounts, or otherwise indicative of an elevated threat of fraud or 56 unlawful activity. S. 10069 4 1 (d) The use of a third-party service provider to perform identity 2 verification shall not relieve a mobile sports wagering licensee of its 3 responsibility to comply with this subdivision. 4 (e) Where a mobile sports wagering licensee cannot form a reasonable 5 belief that it knows the true identity of a prospective sports bettor, 6 such licensee shall not activate the account or permit the placement of 7 sports wagers and shall take such further action as may be required by 8 the commission. 9 4. (a) Each authorized sports bettor shall be required to use a user- 10 name and password or other primary login credential, together with at 11 least one additional authentication factor that is independent of such 12 username and password or other primary login credential, to verify such 13 authorized sports bettor's identity, which shall include one or more of 14 the following: 15 (i) biometric data, including fingerprint, facial or voice recogni- 16 tion; 17 (ii) an authorization code sent by phone call, text message or email 18 to the appropriate contact information provided at the opening of the 19 account; 20 (iii) knowledge-based authentication methods, including security ques- 21 tions, where approved by the commission; 22 (iv) device-based authentication tied to a previously verified device; 23 or 24 (v) any other authorization types as approved by the commission. 25 (b) Following successful multi-factor authentication, a mobile sports 26 wagering licensee may permit continued access to the same account on the 27 same verified device without re-authentication for a period not to 28 exceed one hour. 29 (c) No single authentication factor shall satisfy both the primary and 30 additional authentication requirements of this subdivision. 31 (d) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall promptly re-verify infor- 32 mation required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision two of this 33 section after such information is modified and as required by the 34 commission. 35 (e) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall implement written monitor- 36 ing procedures reasonably designed to detect suspicious activity, 37 account compromise, fraud, account sharing, proxy betting, placement of 38 a sports wager by a prohibited sport bettor, or other unlawful activity. 39 (f) Where monitoring conducted pursuant to paragraph (e) of this 40 subdivision identifies activity reasonably indicating a material risk of 41 account compromise, fraud, account sharing, proxy betting, the placement 42 of a sports wager by a prohibited sports bettor, or other unlawful 43 activity, the mobile sports wagering licensee shall promptly suspend the 44 affected account pending review. If, following such review, the mobile 45 sports wagering licensee determines that such activity is likely to have 46 occurred or be occurring, the commission shall be notified, and the 47 account shall remain suspended until corrective measures required pursu- 48 ant to commission regulation have been implemented. 49 (g) If a mobile sports wagering licensee or the commission determines 50 that an authorized sports bettor or any other person has, in connection 51 with mobile sports wagering, knowingly engaged in fraud, account shar- 52 ing, proxy betting, or other unlawful activity, such authorized sports 53 bettor, and any other person determined to have knowingly participated 54 in such activity, may be designated a prohibited sports bettor in 55 accordance with commission regulation. S. 10069 5 1 5. (a) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall establish, implement, 2 and maintain written responsible gaming procedures reasonably designed 3 to identify, assess, and mitigate gambling-related harm, including 4 through risk assessments conducted pursuant to this section. 5 (b) Such procedures shall be incorporated into the mobile sports 6 wagering licensee's system of internal controls and subject to review by 7 the commission and approval as required by commission regulation. 8 (c) Each mobile sports wagering licensee shall designate a responsible 9 gaming lead who shall be a senior employee or officer with sufficient 10 authority and resources to implement, oversee, and enforce such mobile 11 sports wagering licensee's responsible gaming procedures and ensure that 12 such procedures comply with this section and applicable commission regu- 13 lations. 14 (i) Such responsible gaming lead shall ensure that risk assessments 15 are conducted in accordance with this section and applicable commission 16 regulations. 17 (ii) Such responsible gaming lead shall oversee documentation, record 18 retention, internal review, and reporting obligations pursuant to this 19 section. 20 (iii) The designation of a responsible gaming lead shall not relieve a 21 mobile sports wagering licensee of ultimate responsibility for compli- 22 ance. 23 (iv) The responsible gaming lead shall provide periodic written 24 reports, no less than annually, to senior management of the mobile 25 sports wagering licensee regarding the following: 26 (A) the effectiveness of responsible gaming procedures; 27 (B) trends in risk assessments and risk designations, including 28 at-risk, elevated-risk, and high-risk sports bettor designations; 29 (C) responsible gaming actions and interventions undertaken; and 30 (D) recommendations for modifications or improvements to responsible 31 gaming procedures. 32 (v) Such reports shall be documented and retained in accordance with 33 subdivision eight of this section and made available to the commission 34 upon request. 35 (d) Responsible gaming procedures shall include training for relevant 36 employees regarding risk factors, risk assessment, documentation, and 37 responsible gaming obligations in accordance with commission regu- 38 lations. 39 (e) Responsible gaming procedures shall include periodic internal 40 review of the effectiveness of risk assessments, responsible gaming 41 actions taken pursuant to this section, and other procedures as 42 prescribed by the commission. Such review shall be documented and made 43 available to the commission upon request. 44 6. (a) Responsible gaming procedures shall include ongoing monitoring 45 and documentation reasonably designed to identify risk factors associ- 46 ated with an authorized sports bettor, including but not limited to the 47 following: 48 (i) escalation in wager size or loss exposure, or patterns of 49 sustained wagering losses; 50 (ii) increases in deposit frequency or amounts, including rapid or 51 repeated redeposit behavior following losses; 52 (iii) extended duration, high-frequency, or repeated late-night wager- 53 ing sessions, or other patterns of intensified engagement with the 54 mobile sports wagering platform; 55 (iv) frequent modification or removal of deposit, wager, or time 56 limits or reversal of withdrawals from an account; S. 10069 6 1 (v) repeated failed payment transactions or other indicators of finan- 2 cial distress; 3 (vi) frequent interactions with responsible gaming tools or resources 4 that may indicate heightened risk; and 5 (vii) any other risk factor established by regulation of the commis- 6 sion. 7 (b) The commission shall promulgate regulations establishing guidance 8 regarding the identification, weighting, and evaluation of risk factors 9 consistent with this section. 10 7. (a) Responsible gaming procedures shall include a documented risk 11 assessment conducted when risk factors, individually or in combination, 12 reach objective, evidence-based thresholds established pursuant to 13 commission regulation, which may be qualitative, quantitative, or both, 14 and reasonably indicate that an authorized sports bettor is at signif- 15 icant risk of gambling-related harm. 16 (i) Such review shall evaluate the nature, frequency, and severity of 17 the risk factors. 18 (ii) The results of such review shall be documented and retained in 19 accordance with subdivision eight of this section. 20 (b) If, following completion of a risk assessment conducted pursuant 21 to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, a mobile sports wagering licensee 22 determines that an authorized sports bettor is at significant risk of 23 gambling-related harm, such authorized sports bettor shall be designated 24 as an at-risk sports bettor. 25 (c) The commission shall establish additional criteria, including 26 objective, evidence-based thresholds, to determine whether an at-risk 27 sports bettor qualifies as an elevated-risk or high-risk sports bettor. 28 (d) A prior risk assessment or risk designation of an authorized 29 sports bettor shall not relieve a mobile sports wagering licensee of its 30 obligation to continue monitoring such authorized sports bettor pursuant 31 to subdivision six of this section or to conduct subsequent risk assess- 32 ments where such monitoring identifies risk factors that meet or exceed 33 objective, evidence-based thresholds established pursuant to commission 34 regulation. Risk assessments shall be conducted on an ongoing basis as 35 warranted by such monitoring and may result in the maintenance, esca- 36 lation, or reduction of an authorized sports bettor's risk designation. 37 8. (a) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall document, in a manner 38 sufficient to demonstrate compliance with this section and applicable 39 commission regulations, the following: 40 (i) suspicious activity associated with an account, such as indicators 41 of account sharing, proxy betting, fraud, or otherwise unlawful activ- 42 ity, including the investigation and disposition of such activity; 43 (ii) documentation relating to identity verification procedures and 44 resolution of discrepancies pursuant to subdivision three of this 45 section; 46 (iii) documentation of re-verification actions taken pursuant to 47 subdivision four of this section; 48 (iv) documentation of periodic internal reviews conducted pursuant to 49 subdivision five of this section; 50 (v) documentation of reports provided to senior management pursuant to 51 subdivision five of this section; 52 (vi) risk factors identified pursuant to subdivision six of this 53 section associated with authorized sports bettors; 54 (vii) risk assessments conducted pursuant to subdivision seven of this 55 section; S. 10069 7 1 (viii) determinations regarding whether an authorized sports bettor 2 qualifies as an at-risk sports bettor, elevated-risk sports bettor, or 3 high-risk sports bettor; 4 (ix) any responsible gaming actions and interventions taken in 5 response to such determinations; and 6 (x) other information required pursuant to commission regulation 7 consistent with this section. 8 (b) The responsible gaming lead shall establish and periodically 9 update a list of at-risk sports bettors, which shall be provided to the 10 commission upon request. 11 (i) An at-risk sports bettor may be removed from such list if, pursu- 12 ant to a subsequent risk assessment conducted in accordance with this 13 section, such authorized sports bettor is determined to no longer quali- 14 fy as an at-risk sports bettor. 15 (ii) If an authorized sports bettor meets or exceeds thresholds estab- 16 lished pursuant to commission regulations under subdivision seven of 17 this section that trigger a risk assessment and is subsequently deter- 18 mined not to qualify as an at-risk sports bettor, the documented risk 19 assessment shall include the specific reasons for such determination. 20 (c) All records required pursuant to this section shall be retained 21 for not less than five years, or such longer period as may be required 22 by regulations promulgated by the commission, except as provided in 23 paragraph (c) of subdivision nine of this section. 24 (d) The commission may require periodic reporting, in anonymized or 25 aggregated form, regarding demographic information, risk factors, risk 26 assessments, responsible gaming actions and interventions, and related 27 outcomes for the purpose of: 28 (i) evaluating compliance with this section and applicable commission 29 regulations; 30 (ii) assessing the effectiveness of responsible gaming procedures; and 31 (iii) informing public policy development related to mobile sports 32 wagering, responsible gaming, and gambling-related harm. 33 (e) No personally identifiable information collected pursuant to this 34 section shall be disclosed unless otherwise required by law. 35 (f) The commission may audit compliance with this section and regu- 36 lations promulgated hereunder. 37 (g) Nothing in this section shall require a mobile sports wagering 38 licensee to verify an authorized or prospective sports bettor's income, 39 assets, or credit history. 40 (h) The commission shall promulgate regulations establishing minimum 41 standards for documentation, record retention, testing, and auditing of 42 responsible gaming procedures required pursuant to this section. 43 9. (a) No mobile sports wagering licensee shall sell, share or other- 44 wise allow third-party access to consumer data required to be collected 45 by this section with third parties unless such selling or sharing is 46 strictly necessary to provide, maintain, improve, or update the services 47 requested by an authorized sports bettor, to comply with applicable law, 48 or as otherwise required by this section or commission regulation. 49 (b) Upon receipt of a verifiable request from an authorized sports 50 bettor, a mobile sports wagering licensee shall, without undue delay, 51 make available a copy of all consumer data that such mobile sports 52 wagering licensee has collected about such authorized sports bettor 53 pursuant to this section. 54 (c) Upon the deletion of an authorized sports bettor's account, such 55 authorized sports bettor may request that the mobile sports wagering S. 10069 8 1 licensee delete all consumer data that the mobile sports wagering licen- 2 see has collected about such authorized sports bettor. 3 (i) Upon receiving such request, the mobile sports wagering licensee 4 shall delete all such consumer data within thirty days and provide such 5 authorized sports bettor with confirmation that all such consumer data 6 has been deleted. 7 (ii) Notwithstanding subdivision eight of this section or any other 8 provision of state law relating solely to record retention requirements 9 of this section, the deletion requirements of this paragraph shall 10 control. 11 (iii) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall not be required to 12 comply with the deletion requirements of this paragraph to the extent 13 that retaining such consumer data is required by federal law, a judicial 14 order, or an ongoing regulatory investigation or enforcement action. 15 (d) Each mobile sports wagering licensee shall develop, implement, and 16 maintain reasonable administrative, technical, and physical safeguards 17 to protect consumer data against unauthorized access, disclosure, alter- 18 ation, or destruction, consistent with commission regulations. Such 19 safeguards shall be appropriate to the nature and scope of such mobile 20 sports wagering licensee's activities and the sensitivity of the consum- 21 er data collected. 22 10. (a) The commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as 23 are necessary and appropriate to implement, maintain, and enforce the 24 provisions of this section, including but not limited to rules and regu- 25 lations: 26 (i) establishing standards governing account creation and closure 27 pursuant to subdivision two of this section; 28 (ii) establishing minimum standards for identity verification proce- 29 dures pursuant to subdivision three of this section; 30 (iii) establishing standards for multi-factor authentication and ongo- 31 ing verification pursuant to subdivision four of this section; 32 (iv) governing the review and approval of responsible gaming proce- 33 dures pursuant to subdivision five of this section; 34 (v) establishing guidance and requirements concerning the identifica- 35 tion, weighting, evaluation, and documentation of risk factors pursuant 36 to subdivision six of this section; 37 (vi) establishing objective, evidence-based thresholds and additional 38 criteria for risk assessments pursuant to subdivision seven of this 39 section; 40 (vii) establishing documentation, record retention, reporting, test- 41 ing, and auditing requirements pursuant to subdivision eight of this 42 section; and 43 (viii) establishing standards for data security and safeguards pursu- 44 ant to this subdivision. 45 (b) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the commission 46 may: 47 (i) conduct examinations, investigations, and audits of mobile sports 48 wagering licensees to determine compliance with this section and regu- 49 lations promulgated pursuant to this section; 50 (ii) require the submission of records, reports, or other information 51 necessary to evaluate compliance; 52 (iii) issue written findings of deficiency; 53 (iv) require corrective action plans within such timeframes as the 54 commission may prescribe; and 55 (v) order the suspension or modification of practices found to be in 56 violation of this section or commission regulation. S. 10069 9 1 (c) A violation of this section or regulations promulgated pursuant to 2 this section shall constitute a violation of this chapter and shall be 3 subject to civil penalties, license conditions, suspension, revocation, 4 or other disciplinary action as authorized under this chapter and regu- 5 lations of the commission. 6 (d) In determining the appropriate enforcement action or penalty, the 7 commission may consider: 8 (i) the nature and severity of the violation; 9 (ii) whether the violation was knowing, reckless, or negligent; 10 (iii) the duration and frequency of the violation; 11 (iv) the mobile sports wagering licensee's history of prior 12 violations; 13 (v) the degree of harm or risk of harm to authorized sports bettors; 14 and 15 (vi) the mobile sports wagering licensee's cooperation and corrective 16 efforts. 17 (e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any other 18 authority of the commission under this chapter or other applicable law. 19 (f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a private 20 right of action. 21 § 2. Subparagraph (xv) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 22 1367-a of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, as added by 23 section 4 of part Y of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, is amended to 24 read as follows: 25 (xv) submit annually a problem gaming plan that was approved by the 26 commission in consultation with the office of addiction services and 27 supports that includes: the objectives of and timetables for implement- 28 ing the plan; identification of the persons responsible for implementing 29 and maintaining the plan; procedures for identifying users with 30 suspected or known problem gaming behavior; procedures for providing 31 information to users concerning problem gaming identification and 32 resources; procedures to prevent gaming by minors and self-excluded 33 persons; and such other problem gaming information as the commission may 34 require by rule; provided further, that such problem gaming plan shall 35 include responsible gaming procedures pursuant to section thirteen 36 hundred sixty-seven-b of this title. 37 § 3. The opening paragraph of subdivision 1 of section 1367 of the 38 racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, as amended by section 3 39 of part Y of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 40 follows: 41 As used in this section [and in], section thirteen hundred sixty-sev- 42 en-a, and section thirteen hundred sixty-seven-b of this title: 43 § 4. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 1367-a of the racing, 44 pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, as added by section 4 of part Y 45 of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 46 (a) Except as provided in this subdivision, the terms in this section 47 shall have the same meanings as such terms are defined in subdivision 48 one of section thirteen hundred sixty-seven and subdivision one of 49 section thirteen hundred sixty-seven-b of this title. 50 § 5. Subdivision 8 of section 1367 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering 51 and breeding law, as amended by section 1 of part OO of chapter 59 of 52 the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 53 8. Notwithstanding section thirteen hundred fifty-one of this article, 54 mobile sports wagering gross gaming revenue and tax revenue shall be 55 excluded from sports wagering gross gaming revenue and tax revenue. 56 Mobile sports wagering tax revenue shall be separately maintained and S. 10069 10 1 returned to the state for deposit into the state lottery fund for educa- 2 tion aid except as otherwise provided in this subdivision. Any interest 3 and penalties imposed by the commission relating to those taxes, all 4 penalties levied and collected by the commission, and the appropriate 5 funds, cash or prizes forfeited from sports wagering shall be deposited 6 into the state lottery fund for education; provided, however, that 7 penalties levied against mobile sports wagering licensees for violations 8 of problem gaming plan requirements pursuant to subdivision four of 9 section one thousand three hundred sixty-seven-a of this title and 10 responsible gaming procedures pursuant to section one thousand three 11 hundred sixty-seven-b of this title shall be deposited as follows: one- 12 third to the state lottery fund for education aid; one-third to be 13 collected by the commission and deposited into the commercial gaming 14 revenue fund, established in section ninety-seven-nnnn of the state 15 finance law, to be distributed for problem gambling education and treat- 16 ment purposes pursuant to paragraph a of subdivision four of such 17 section; and one-third shall be retained by the commission for the 18 administration and enforcement of such problem gaming plan and responsi- 19 ble gaming procedure requirements. In fiscal year two thousand twenty- 20 two, the commission shall pay into the commercial gaming fund one 21 percent of the state tax imposed on mobile sports wagering by this 22 section to be distributed for problem gambling education and treatment 23 purposes pursuant to paragraph a of subdivision four of section ninety- 24 seven-nnnn of the state finance law; provided however, that such amount 25 shall be equal to six million dollars for each fiscal year through 26 fiscal year two thousand twenty-six and twelve million dollars for each 27 fiscal year thereafter, provided that this amount may only be expended 28 pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget. In fiscal 29 year two thousand twenty-two, the commission shall pay one percent of 30 the state tax imposed on mobile sports wagering by this section to the 31 general fund, a program to be administered by the office of children and 32 family services for a statewide youth sports activities and education 33 grant program for the purpose of providing annual awards to sports 34 programs for underserved youth under the age of eighteen years; provided 35 however, that such amount shall be equal to five million dollars for 36 each fiscal year thereafter. The commission shall require at least 37 monthly deposits by a platform provider of any payments pursuant to 38 subdivision seven of this section, at such times, under such conditions, 39 and in such depositories as shall be prescribed by the state comp- 40 troller. The deposits shall be deposited to the credit of the state 41 commercial gaming revenue fund. The commission shall require a monthly 42 report and reconciliation statement to be filed with it on or before the 43 tenth day of each month, with respect to gross revenues and deposits 44 received and made, respectively, during the preceding month. 45 § 6. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 46 it shall have become a law.